Utah statutes.
63M-1-2907.   Rulemaking authority.

The office shall, by rule, made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, establish:

(1)  criteria to prioritize the issuance of tax credits amongst tax credit applicants in a manner consistent with this part; and

(2)  procedures for documenting the office's application of the criteria described in Subsection (1).



Enacted by Chapter 306, 2011 General Session

